Florida, session 2026, HB227.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 196.041, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
196.041 Extent of homestead exemptions.—
(1) Vendees in possession of real estate under bona fide
contracts to purchase when such instruments, under which they
claim title, are recorded in the office of the clerk of the
circuit court where said properties lie, and who reside thereon
in good faith and make the same their permanent residence;
persons residing on real estate by virtue of dower or other
estates therein limited in time by deed, will, jointure, or
settlement; and lessees owning the leasehold interest in a bona
fide lease having an original term of 98 years or more in a
residential parcel or in a condominium parcel as defined in
chapter 718, even if such lease contains a provision terminating
the leasehold interest upon the death of the lessees, or persons
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb227-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 227 2026
holding leases of 50 years or more, existing prior to June 19,
1973, for the purpose of homestead exemptions from ad valorem
taxes and no other purpose, shall be deemed to have legal or
beneficial and equitable title to said property. In addition, a
tenant-stockholder or member of a cooperative apartment
corporation who is entitled solely by reason of ownership of
stock or membership in the corporation to occupy for dwelling
purposes an apartment in a building owned by the corporation,
for the purpose of homestead exemption from ad valorem taxes and
for no other purpose, is deemed to have beneficial title in
equity to said apartment and a proportionate share of the land
on which the building is situated.
Section 2. The amendment made by this act to s. 196.041,
Florida Statutes, is remedial and clarifying in nature.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb227-01-c1